District of Columbia statutes.
15-305

Issuance of writ after expiration of period.

A writ of execution not issued within the time allowed therefor, may not be issued until the judgment has been revived. The same rule applies to the order of revival in relation to the issuance of a writ of execution as to the original judgment.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Extension of lien of judgment or decree by order of revival, see § 15-102.
1981 Ed., § 15-305.
1973 Ed., § 15-305.